District of Columbia statutes.
16-545

Multiple attachments against same judgment debtor.

Only one attachment upon goods, chattels, and credits of a judgment debtor may be satisfied at one time. Where more than one such attachment issued against the same judgment debtor is served on a garnishee the attachments shall be satisfied in the order in which they were served upon the garnishee. This section does not apply with respect to an attachment upon wages to which subchapter III of this chapter applies.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-545.
1973 Ed., § 16-545.